Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 33-13-1.
Definitions.

In this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“State military forces” means the National Guard of this state, as defined in Section 101(3), (4) and (6) of Title 32, United States Code, and any other militia or military forces organized under the Constitution and laws of this state.

“Commanding officer” includes commissioned officers and warrant officers, as applicable.

“Officer” means commissioned or warrant officer.

“Superior commissioned officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command.

“Officer candidate” means a cadet of the state officer candidate school.

“Enlisted member” means a person in an enlisted grade.

“Military” refers to any or all of the state military forces.

“Accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused.

“Military judge” means an official of a court-martial detailed in accordance with Section 33-13-183.

“Convening authority” includes, in addition to the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, or a successor in command.

“Legal officer” means any commissioned officer of the state military forces designated to perform legal duties for a command.

“State judge advocate” means the judge advocate of the state military forces, commissioned therein, and responsible for supervising the administration of military justice in the state military forces, and performing such other legal duties as may be required by the Adjutant General.

“Grade” means a step or degree, in a graduated scale of office or military rank that is established and designated as a grade by law or regulation.

“Rank” means the order of precedence among members of the state military forces.

“Military duty (or duty status)” means all duty authorized under the Constitution and laws of the State of Mississippi and all training authorized under Title 32, United States Code.

“Judge advocate” means any commissioned officer who is certified by the state judge advocate.

“Military court” means a court-martial, a court of inquiry, a military commission, or a provost court.

“May” is used in a permissive sense.

“Shall” is used in an imperative sense.

“He”, where used, means, and shall be interpreted to include, both the masculine and feminine gender.

“Code” means this chapter which may be cited as the Mississippi Code of Military Justice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-01; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§33-13-3. [Codes, 1942, § 8529-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 2]

§ 33-13-5.
Concurrent jurisdiction with civilian courts.

This code shall constitute concurrent jurisdiction with appropriate civilian courts over offenses in punitive Sections 33-13-451 through 33-13-465 and 33-13-467 through 33-13-529. Any other crimes defined by statute or existing at common law may be prosecuted by proper authorities as authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-5 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-03; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 3] recodified as §33-13-9 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 5. Section33-13-5 enacted by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-7.
Persons subject to code.

This code applies to all members of the state military forces who are not in active federal service of the United States.

The voluntary enlistment of any person who has the capacity to understand the significance of enlisting in the state military forces shall be valid for purposes of jurisdiction under subsection (1) of this section and a change of status from civilian to member of the state military forces shall be effective upon taking the oath of enlistment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person serving with the state military forces who:

Submitted voluntarily to military authority;

Met the mental competency and minimum age qualifications (10 USCS Sections 504 and 505) at the time of voluntary submission to military authority;

Received military pay or allowances; and

Performed military duties;

is subject to this code until such person’s service has been terminated in accordance with law or regulations.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-3 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 2] amended and recodified as §33-13-7 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1981. Former33-13-7 recodified as §33-13-11.

§ 33-13-9.
Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

Each person separated from the state military forces who committed offenses while subject to this code, before such separation, and who later returned to the status of a person subject to this code, is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed before separation, including fraudulent discharge.

No person who has deserted from state military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-5 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-03; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 3] amended and recodified as §33-13-9 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1981. Former §33-13-9 recodified as §33-13-13.

§ 33-13-11.
Dismissal of commissioned officer.

If any commissioned officer, dismissed by order of the Governor, makes a written application for trial by court-martial, setting forth, under oath, that he has been wrongfully dismissed, the Governor, as soon as practicable, shall convene a general court-martial to try that officer on the charges on which he was dismissed. A court-martial so convened has jurisdiction to try the dismissed officer on those charges, and he shall be considered to have waived the right to plead any statute of limitations applicable to any offense with which he is charged. The court-martial may, as part of its sentence, adjudge the affirmance of the dismissal, but if the court-martial acquits the accused he shall retain his status in the Mississippi military forces.

If the Governor fails to convene a general court-martial within three (3) months from the presentation of an application for trial under this code, the Adjutant General of Mississippi, or his designee, acting on behalf of the Governor, shall substitute for the dismissal ordered by the Governor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue.

If a discharge is substituted for a dismissal under this code, the Governor alone may reappoint the officer to such commissioned grade and with such rank as, in the opinion of the Governor, that former officer would have attained had he not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer may be made only if a vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes.

If an officer is discharged from the state military forces by administrative action or by board proceedings under law, he has no right to trial under this section.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-7 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-04; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 4] amended and recodified as §33-13-11 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1981. Former §33-13-11 recodified as §33-13-15.

§ 33-13-13.
Territorial applicability of code.

This code applies throughout the state. It also applies to all persons otherwise subject to this code while they are serving outside the state in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were serving inside the state.

Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the state, with the same jurisdiction and power as to persons subject to this code as if the proceedings were held inside the state, and offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-9 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-05; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 5] amended and recodified as §33-13-13 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-15.
Judge advocates and legal officers.

The Adjutant General shall appoint an officer of the state military forces as state judge advocate. To be eligible for appointment, an officer must have been a member of the bar of a federal court and of the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi for at least five (5) years, and a member of the judge advocate general corps for at least five (5) years.

The Adjutant General shall appoint judge advocates and legal officers upon recommendation of the state judge advocate. To be eligible for appointment, judge advocates or legal officers must be officers of the state military forces and members of the bar of a federal court and the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi.

The state judge advocate or his assistants shall make frequent inspections in the field in supervision of the administration of military justice.

Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with their staff judge advocates or legal officers in matters relating to the administration of military justice; and the staff judge advocates or legal officers of any command are entitled to communicate directly with the staff judge advocates or legal officers of a superior or subordinate command, or with the state judge advocate.

No person who has acted as a member, military judge, trial counsel or investigating officer, or who has been a witness for either the prosecution or defense in any case may later act as staff judge advocate or legal officer to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-11 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-06; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 6] amended and recodified as §33-13-15 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1981.